Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 20268-3018
Application for charter; director; investigation and examination.

Upon receiving an application for a charter to become a digital asset depository institution or for a charter to operate a digital asset depository department, the applicable fee, and other information required by the director, the director shall make a careful investigation and examination of the following:

(1) The character, reputation, criminal record, financial standing, and ability of the shareholders owning ten percent or more equity in the applicant;

(2) The character, financial responsibility, criminal background, banking or other financial experience, and business qualifications of those proposed as officers and directors;

(3) Whether the applicant or any of its officers, directors, or shareholders owning ten percent or more equity in the applicant have ever been convicted of any (i) misdemeanor involving any aspect of a digital asset depository business or any business of a similar nature or (ii) felony;

(4) Whether the applicant or any of its officers, directors, or shareholders owning ten percent or more equity in the applicant have ever been permanently or temporarily enjoined by a court of competent jurisdiction from engaging in or continuing any conduct or practice involving any aspect of a digital asset depository business or any business of a similar nature;

(5) A criminal history record information check of the applicant, its officers, directors, and shareholders owning ten percent or more equity in the applicant. The direct cost of the criminal history record information check shall be paid by the applicant; and

(6) The application for a charter, including the adequacy and plausibility of the business plan of the digital asset depository, the benefits to the customers, and whether the applicant has offered a complete proposal for compliance with the Nebraska Financial Innovation Act.

Laws 2021, LB649, § 18;

Laws 2023, LB92, § 32.